Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 440G

CABLE TELEVISION SYSTEMS

Section

440G-1 Short title

440G-2 Repealed

440G-3 Definitions

440G-4 Issuance of cable franchises and
regulation of

cable operators by director of commerce
and

consumer affairs

440G-5 Cable franchise required

440G-6 Application or proposal for cable
franchise; fee;

certain requirements

440G-7 Cable franchise application or proposal

procedure; public hearing; notice

440G-8 Issuance of cable franchise authority;
criteria;

content

440G-8.1 Requirement for adequate service; terms
and

conditions of service

440G-8.2 Cable system installation, construction,

operation, removal; general provisions

440G-8.3 Designation of access organizations for
public,

educational, or governmental access
channels

440G-9 Complaints; violations; revocation,
alteration,

or suspension of cable franchise;
penalties

440G-10 Renewal of cable franchise

440G-10.1 Transfer of cable franchise

440G-11 Rate, filed with director; approval

440G-11.5 Other duties of the director; broadband
services

440G-12 Other duties of director; suit to enforce
chapter

440G-13 Cable advisory committee

440G-14 Reports

440G-15 Annual fees

440G-16 Rules

440G-17 Criminal and civil liability

Cross References

Telecommunications and cable industry reporting, see chapter
440J.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next